Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-851
Easement for encroachment.

To the extent that any unit or common element encroaches on any other unit or common element, a valid easement for the encroachment exists. The easement does not relieve a unit owner of liability in case of his or her willful misconduct nor relieve a declarant or any other person of liability for failure to adhere to the plats and plans.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 27.